Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1103
Secretary of State; duties; fee.

The Secretary of State shall maintain a separate file for mortgages, security agreements and financing statements on which the debtor is a corporation which is a railroad, or by any corporation including public corporations engaged in the furnishing of electric or telephone service and the uniform fee for filing, indexing, and furnishing filing data for such financing statements shall be one dollar per page, but the total fee shall not be less than five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars.

Laws 1965, c. 452, § 3, p. 1434.